Montana, session 2025, SB370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 3-15-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-15-201. Fees in courts of record. (1) A grand or trial jury panel member must receive $12 $60
$25 per a day for attendance before any court of record and a mileage allowance, as provided in 2-18-503, for
traveling each way between the member's residence and the court. Those jurors selected from the panel for a
case must receive an additional $13 $60 $25 a day while serving.
(2) A juror who is excused from attendance upon on the juror's own motion on the first day of
appearance in obedience to a notice or who has been summoned as a special juror and not sworn in the trial of
the case forfeits per diem and mileage."


NEW SECTION. Section 2. Funding allocation .. There is funding allocated to the department of
justice OFFICE OF COURT ADMINISTRATOR to reimburse counties COURTS OF RECORD for the funding required by 3-
15-201 in criminal cases .. A county COURT OF RECORD seeking reimbursement shall provide an invoice to the
department OFFICE OF COURT ADMINISTRATOR within 30 days of the final day of a criminal trial or settlement of a
criminal case if the settlement occurs after the jury is required to report to the courthouse or the jury is
empaneled ..
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 370